Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 2. Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund.

§ 60.2-306.
Fund continued; available to Commission.

The special fund in the state treasury known as the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund is continued. All moneys which are deposited or paid into this fund shall be held for use by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-95; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-112; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-307.
Moneys constituting fund.

The fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated by this Commonwealth, and all moneys received from the United States, any agency thereof or any other source, for the purpose declared in §

60.2-308

. Notwithstanding any provision of this article, all moneys requisitioned and deposited in this fund pursuant to the provisions of subsection C of §

60.2-305

shall remain part of the Unemployment Trust Fund and shall be used only in accordance with the conditions specified in §

60.2-305

.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-96; 1956, c. 440; 1960, c. 54; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-113; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-308.
Expenditures solely for cost of administration.

All moneys in this fund shall be expended solely for the purpose of defraying the cost of the administration of this title and for no other purpose whatsoever.

All moneys received by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of § 302 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 502), shall be expended solely for the purposes and in the amounts found necessary by the Secretary of Labor of the United States for the proper and efficient administration of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-97; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-114; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-309.
Special employment service account.

A special employment service account shall be maintained as a part of the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund for the purposes (i) of maintaining the public employment offices established pursuant to §

60.2-400

, and (ii) of cooperating with the United States Employment Service.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-99; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-116; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-310.
Financing.

The State Treasurer is authorized to receive all grants of money apportioned to this Commonwealth under the federal law referred to in §

60.2-400

. All funds so received shall be paid into the separate employment service account in the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund, and are to be held for appropriation to the Commission for the purposes for which they are granted to this Commonwealth.

As a part of any such agreement as is mentioned in subsection C of §

60.2-400

the Commission may accept moneys, services or quarters as a contribution to the employment service account.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-88; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-104; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-311.
Replacing funds lost or expended for unnecessary purposes.

The Commission is authorized and directed to replace in the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund, within a reasonable time, out of any funds appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose, any moneys received by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of § 302 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 502), which because of any action or contingency (i) are lost or (ii) are expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of those found necessary by the Secretary of Labor of the United States for the proper administration of this title. The Commission is directed to report to the Governor in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 3 of §

2.2-1501

the amount necessary to make such replacement to the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund. The Governor shall include in the budget reported to the General Assembly and in the budget bill submitted under §

2.2-1508

the amount necessary to be appropriated for such purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-98; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-115; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-312.
Disbursements by State Treasurer upon warrants of Comptroller.

All payments and disbursements from the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer upon warrants of the Comptroller issued upon vouchers signed by the Commissioner or by such other person as the Commissioner may designate for that purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-100; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-117; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-313.
Expenses incurred by Auditor of Public Accounts, Comptroller and State Treasurer.

All expenses incurred by the Auditor of Public Accounts in auditing the books, records and accounts of the Commission and in rendering other services to the Commission and all expense incurred by the Comptroller and the State Treasurer in performing the services required by this title, may be treated as administrative expenses of the Commission and accordingly paid by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-101; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-118; 1986, c. 480.